Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1002
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 9-1001 to 9-1006:

(1) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling;

(2) Problem gambling means maladaptive gambling behavior that disrupts personal, family, or vocational pursuits; and

(3) Program means the Gamblers Assistance Program.

Laws 2013, LB6, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 34.
July 1, 2026